Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
LOCAL BROADBAND CHAMPIONS
SECTION 1.
 (1) As used in this section, “local broadband champion” means  a local gov-
ernment official, elected official, educator, business,  organization, resident, community
leader or other person that advocates for local broadband infrastructure  improvements in
the person’s community.
(2) The Oregon Broadband Advisory  Council, established under section 1, chapter 782,
Oregon Laws 2009, shall  conduct a study to identify options for a local broadband champion
program to foster and  support local broadband champions. No later than December 1, 2018,
the council shall report to the interim legislative  committees on economic development with
a proposed local broadband champion program structure that identifies potential public or
private partnerships and anticipated funding needs and sources.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2019.
CONNECTING OREGON SCHOOLS FUND
SECTION 3.  (1) The Connecting Oregon Schools  Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Connecting  Oregon
Schools Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Connecting Oregon Schools Fund consists  of any moneys deposited in the fund
from whatever  source and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or trans-
ferred to the fund  by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys
in the fund.
Enrolled House Bill 4023 (HB 4023-C) Page 1
(3) The moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Department of Educa-
tion for the  purpose of providing matching funds for federal moneys received by school dis-
tricts for the purpose of providing broadband access to eligible schools in this state.
(4) A school is eligible to receive matching funds under this section if the school:
(a) Is a kindergarten through grade 12 public school in this state;
(b) Receives federal moneys for the purpose of  providing broadband access to the school;
(c) Takes steps to determine whether  existing broadband infrastructure, including fiber-
based broadband, may be integrated into the proposed broadband access project; and
(d) Meets any other eligibility requirements established by the State  Board of Education
by rule.
(5)(a) Before the department may distribute any state moneys under this section,  the
board shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of  this section, including rules setting
criteria that govern the distribution of the moneys to eligible schools.
(b) Rules adopted under this section must take into consideration any eligibility require-
ments established by the federal program awarding federal moneys.
BROADBAND SERVICES ADVISORY COMMITTEE
SECTION 4.
 ORS 276A.406 is amended to read:
276A.406. (1) As used in this section  and ORS 276A.412 and section 5 of this 2018 Act :
[(a) “Advanced digital communications” means equipment,  facilities and capability to distribute
digital communications signals for transmitting voice, data, image and video over distance. ]
(a) “Broadband” means wide bandwidth  communications transmissions over coaxial ca-
ble, optical fiber, radio or twisted pair with an ability to simultaneously  transport multiple
signals and traffic types  at a minimum transmission speed established by the State Chief
Information Officer by  rule, but in no event less than 25 megabits per second for downloads
and three megabits per second for uploads.
(b) “Communications” means media that  communicate voice, data, text or video over a
distance using electrical, electronic or light wave transmissions.
(c) “State agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279A.010.
[(b)] (d) “Telecommunications provider” means any person that is capable of providing [ advanced
digital communications ] broadband and communications services  including, but not limited to, a
telecommunications utility as defined in ORS 759.005, a  competitive telecommunications provider as
defined in ORS 759.005, a cable television provider or an interstate telecommunications provider.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS chapters 279A, 279B and 279C, the State  Chief Information Officer
[may]:
(a) Shall provide broadband and communications services and operations  for the state
and state agencies; and
(b) Subject  to section 5 of this 2018 Act and notwithstanding ORS 276A.206 (6)(c), may
provide broadband services and operations in  unserved or underserved areas to any other
public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, any federally recognized Indian  tribe in Oregon or any
nonprofit organization that the State Chief Information Officer designates as a community
of interest under ORS 276A.206.
(3) The State  Chief Information Officer provides the services and operations under sub-
section (2) of this section if the State Chief Information Officer:
(a) [ Provide advanced digital communications ] Provides the  services directly[ , may];
(b) [ Enter] Enters  into an interagency or intergovernmental agreement under ORS chapter  190
to have another state agency or governmental agency provide [ advanced digital communications] the
services [ or may ]; or
(c) [Acquire advanced digital communications ] Acquires the  services by entering into  contracts
with telecommunications providers or a consortium of telecommunications  providers in a manner
that is consistent with the State Chief Information Officer’s rules, policies and standards.
Enrolled House Bill 4023 (HB 4023-C) Page 2
[(3) After a telecommunications provider  or a consortium of telecommunications providers has in-
stalled an advanced digital communications network, The State Chief Information Officer shall provide
all telecommunications services  and operations for the state and state agencies directly, or shall enter
into interagency or intergovernmental agreements  under ORS chapter 190 to have another state agency
or another governmental agency provide the telecommunications services and operations  in a manner
that is consistent with the State Chief Information Officer’s rules, policies and standards. ]
(4) The  State Chief Information Officer may not enter into any contract or agreement under
subsection (3) of this section or  approve the procurement of  any [ telecommunications] broadband
or communications  system or equipment that is incompatible with the network or that is incon-
sistent with the State Chief Information Officer’s rules, policies and standards.
SECTION 5.
 (1)(a) If  the State Chief Information Officer determines that the broadband
services and operations proposed to be provided by the  State Chief Information Officer under
ORS 276A.406 (2)(b) would directly compete with services already offered  by a telecommuni-
cations provider, the State Chief Information Officer  may only provide those services pur-
suant to the rules described in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) For the purposes of this section,  broadband services are considered to be already of-
fered by a telecommunications provider if the provider can demonstrate its ability to provide
the broadband services in the geographic area to be served within a reasonable  time and for
a reasonable cost.
(2) The  State Chief Information Officer shall adopt rules governing how it provides the
broadband services and operations under subsection (1)(a) of this section. The rules must:
(a) Describe the services that the State Chief Information Officer  proposes to provide,
including specifications for broadband services, such as  minimum bandwidth, reliability, re-
dundancy, deployment schedule and comparable cost;
(b) Describe the method by which the State Chief Information Officer will  maintain and
update its service offerings;
(c) Describe the process by which a telecommunications provider may demonstrate its
ability to provide broadband services under  subsection (1) of this section and to meet the
specifications proposed by the State Chief Information Officer under paragraph (a)  of this
subsection; and
(d) Describe the situations in which the State Chief Information  Officer may not provide
the services.
(3) The State  Chief Information Officer shall appoint an advisory committee no later than
60 days prior to rulemaking under this section  to assist the State Chief Information Officer
in the administration of this section.
(4) The advisory committee must include one representative from each of the following:
(a) A telecommunications provider in this state.
(b) A rural telecommunications consortium in this state.
(c) The Association of Oregon Counties.
(d) The League of Oregon Cities.
(e) A public school or education service district.
(f) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(g) The State Interoperability Executive Council established under ORS 403.450.
(h) The  Oregon Broadband Advisory Council established under section 1, chapter 782,
Oregon Laws 2009.
(i) The public with an interest in broadband service availability.
(j) A nonprofit entity with an interest in broadband service availability.
(k) Any other public, private  or nonprofit entity that the State Chief Information Officer
determines is necessary to assist  the advisory committee in performing its duties under this
section.
Enrolled House Bill 4023 (HB 4023-C) Page 3
(5) Before adopting rules described in this section, the State  Chief Information Officer
shall present the proposed rules to the Joint Legislative Committee on Information  Man-
agement and Technology.
SECTION 6.  ORS 276A.412 is amended to read:
276A.412. (1) For the purposes  of ORS 276A.400 to 276A.412, the State Chief Information Officer
may, in a manner that is consistent with the State  Chief Information Officer’s rules, policies and
standards, enter into a contract or  contracts with telecommunications [ service] providers and
equipment manufacturers for purchasing, using or operating telecommunications equipment  and
services for a period not to exceed 10 years.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the State Chief Information Officer
may enter into a contract or a configuration of agreements related to  broadband
infrastructure, including leases, maintenance and operations of  broadband transmission
equipment, for a period that exceeds 10 years.
[(2)] (3)  For purposes of ORS 276A.206, the State Chief Information Officer may  extend the
benefits of telecommunications contracts for broadband networks,  communications systems,
equipment and services to nonprofit  organizations that the State Chief Information Officer desig-
nates as communities of interest under ORS 276A.206.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 7. The unit captions used in this 2018 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any  leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 8. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4023 (HB 4023-C) Page 4